New Jersey, session 222, S908.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in sections 2 through 6 of this act, at-risk student means a high school student who has been identified by a school district as having a high risk of dropping out of school prior to high school graduation, based on a review of risk factors established by the Commissioner of Education.  An at-risk student may also include a student who has dropped out of school within the previous year. Successful completion means that the student has earned enough credits through the New Jersey Works Dual Enrollment Option Program established pursuant to section 2 of this act to qualify for a high school diploma. 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Education, in conjunction with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, shall establish a New Jersey Works Dual Enrollment Option Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to provide an alternate education option for recent high school dropouts and students who have been identified as at-risk of dropping out of school prior to high school graduation, and to provide these students with job placement assistance. b.    Under the program, an at-risk student may complete his high school graduation requirements through coursework at a county college.  The credits earned at the county college shall be applicable to both the students high school diploma and towards a credential, certificate, or degree offered by the county college. c.     Upon a students successful completion of the program, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall provide the student with job placement services. 3.    a.  The Commissioner of Education shall develop and distribute to each school district a list of risk factors that shall be used to identify at-risk students. b.    The commissioner shall provide guidance to school districts on which career, technical, and academic courses offered by county colleges may be applied as dual credit courses under the program to satisfy high school graduation requirements. 4.    The board of education of a school district and the board of trustees of a county college may enter into an agreement to provide for the education of at-risk students under the program.  The agreement shall specify: a.     which dual credit courses may be credited to the students high school transcript, and how the courses meet high school graduation requirements, as determined by the superintendent of the school district based upon guidance provided by the commissioner pursuant to section 2 of this act; b.    which dual credit courses may be credited towards a credential, certificate, or degree offered by the county college, as determined by the board of trustees of the county college; and c.     a tuition rate to be paid by the board of education to the board of trustees for the education of each at-risk student enrolled in the program who resides in the school district. 5.    A student enrolled in the New Jersey Works Dual Enrollment Option Program shall be ineligible to participate in any athletic or extracurricular activities of the high school. 6.    a.  A student enrolled in the New Jersey Works Dual Enrollment Option Program, and his parent or legal guardian, shall not be responsible for payment of tuition, student fees, or any other costs of the program. b.    A student enrolled in the program shall be included in the districts resident enrollment pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-45), and the school district shall receive State aid for that student as provided pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.). 7.    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop and provide appropriate job placement services for students who successfully complete the New Jersey Works Dual Enrollment Option Program established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.       (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 8.    This act shall take effect immediately.